src/fst/test/gt-norm-yamls/A-krwbiizh_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:



# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct.


  Adjective - krõbīž: # adjectives 209 'eng /est krõbe/fin' - full paradigm
     krõbīž+A+Sg+Nom: krõbīž
     krõbīž+A+Sg+Gen: krõbīž
     krõbīž+A+Sg+Par: krõbīžt
     krõbīž+A+Sg+Dat: krõbīžõn
     krõbīž+A+Sg+Ins: krõbīžõks
     krõbīž+A+Sg+Ill: krõbīžõ
     krõbīž+A+Sg+Ela: krõbīžõst
     krõbīž+A+Pl+Nom: krõbīžt
     krõbīž+A+Pl+Gen: krõbīžt
     krõbīž+A+Pl+Par: krõbīži
     krõbīž+A+Pl+Dat: krõbīžtõn
     krõbīž+A+Pl+Ins: krõbīžtõks
     krõbīž+A+Pl+Ill: krõbīžiz
     krõbīž+A+Pl+Ela: krõbīžist
